Arkansas, session 2025, SB172.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1006(c), concerning the first meeting
of a board of directors of an education service cooperative, is repealed
because the subsection is obsolete.
(c) The first meeting of the board of directors shall be held within
thirty (30) days of January 1, 2024.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-13-1006(d), concerning the first meeting
of a board of directors of an education service cooperative, is amended to
read as follows to repeal obsolete language.
(d) At its first regular meeting, the The board of directors shall
elect a chair.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-15-215 is repealed because the section
expired on June 30, 2020.
6-15-215. The Arkansas Smart Core Incentive Funding Program —
Definitions.
*TNL158*
01/31/2025 10:13:14 AM TNL158

SB172
(a) The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The skills and knowledge gained through Arkansas's Smart
Core curriculum provide the academic foundation required for high school
graduates to succeed in their first year of college or in a job that promises
a well-paying career track; and
(2) School districts should encourage all students who are
capable of completing the Smart Core curriculum to do so.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Eligible high school” means each public high school in a
school district that meets the criteria to receive incentive funding under
subsection (f) of this section and the program rules adopted under this
section by the State Board of Education;
(2) “Smart Core” means the curriculum established by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education under the Standards for
Accreditation of Arkansas Public Schools and School Districts that is part of
Smart Future, a state initiative focused on improving Arkansas public high
schools for all students; and
(3) “Smart Core graduate” means a student who graduated from an
Arkansas public high school after having successfully completed the Smart
Core curriculum.
(c) The Arkansas Smart Core Incentive Funding Program is established
to provide a financial incentive to:
(1) Assist with a public high school's efforts to encourage
public high school students to complete the Smart Core curriculum;
(2) Promote programs that contribute to student success,
including without limitation:
(A) Tutoring;
(B) Quality after-school and summer programs that may
include literacy, math, and science specialists in elementary school; and
(C) Professional development for mathematics, science,
literacy, foreign language, and Advanced Placement instruction; and
(3) Provide support to school counselors to improve student
services.
(d)(1)(A) A school district that receives incentive funding under this
section shall provide the incentive funding to each eligible high school in
the school district.
01/31/2025 10:13:14 AM TNL158

SB172
(B) The eligible high school shall spend the incentive
funding only for the purposes identified in subsection (c) of this section.
(2) A school district that receives incentive funding under the
program shall not use the incentive funding to provide increases to the
salary schedule of the school district.
(e)(1) Subject to an appropriation and available funding for the
program, the division shall pay incentive funding to a school district under
this section based on an annual percentage of Smart Core graduates from a
public high school in the school district.
(2)(A) The division shall make the calculation based on a
student record analysis conducted annually by the division beginning with the
graduating class of 2010.
(B) The division shall exclude from the student record
analysis a student with an individualized education program that does not
require the student to complete the Smart Core curriculum.
(f)(1) By June 30 of each year, the division shall pay to a school
district incentive funding under the program as follows:
(A) If one hundred percent (100%) of a public high
school's graduates in the immediately preceding school year completed the
Smart Core curriculum, the school district where the public high school is
located shall receive one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per Smart Core
graduate;
(B) If at least ninety-five percent (95%) but less than
one hundred percent (100%) of a public high school's graduates in the
immediately preceding school year completed the Smart Core curriculum, the
school district where the public high school is located shall receive one
hundred dollars ($100) per Smart Core graduate; and
(C) If at least ninety percent (90%) but less than ninety-
five percent (95%) of a public high school's graduates in the immediately
preceding school year completed the Smart Core curriculum, the school
district where the public high school is located shall receive fifty dollars
($50.00) per Smart Core graduate.
(2) The division shall not pay incentive funding to a school
district for a public high school in which less than ninety percent (90%) of
its graduates complete the Smart Core curriculum.
(3) If a public high school's graduation rate falls below the
01/31/2025 10:13:14 AM TNL158

SB172
average graduation rate for the public high school for the previous three (3)
school years, the school district is not eligible to receive the full
incentive award under the program for the public high school.
(g) Participation in the program is voluntary.
(h) This section is effective from July 1, 2009, through June 30,
2020.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-16-152(b)(3), concerning the requirements
of a computer science or computer science-related career and technical
education course under the Computer Science Education Advancement Act of
2021, is amended to correct a grammatical error:
(3) A computer science or computer science-related career and
technical education course offered by a public high school shall:
(A) Be of high quality;
(B) Meet or exceed the curriculum standards and
requirements established by the State Board of Education; and
(C) Be made available in a traditional classroom setting,
a blended learning environment, or an online-based or other technology-based
format that is tailored to meet the needs of each participating student.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 6-17-2403(e)(2), concerning the minimum
teacher compensation schedule for a part-time teacher or part-time
paraprofessional employed by a public school under the Teacher Compensation
Program of 2003, is reenacted to ratify the decision made by the Arkansas
Code Revision Commission to insert "open-enrollment public charter school" in
order to correct a reference error.
(2) The minimum teacher compensation schedule for a part-time
teacher or part-time paraprofessional employed by a public school district or
open-enrollment public charter school to work in an adult education program
shall be established by the Adult Education Section and approved by the
Director of the Division of Workforce Services.

SECTION 6. The introductory language of Arkansas Code § 6-17-
2403(f)(2), concerning the requirements to qualify for funding under the
minimum teacher compensation schedule, is reenacted to ratify the decision
made by the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to insert "open-enrollment
01/31/2025 10:13:14 AM TNL158

SB172
public charter schools" to correct a reference error.
(2) To qualify for funding appropriated under this section,
public school districts or open-enrollment public charter schools shall:

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 6-63-317(c), concerning regular salary
procedures and restrictions for institutions of higher education, is
reenacted to ratify the decision made by the Arkansas Code Revision
Commission to codify the subsection at § 6-63-317.
(c)(1) New funding through the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101
et seq., that is determined by the Division of Higher Education to have been
for salary increases for the current fiscal year for institutions of higher
education shall be used exclusively for salary increases.
(2) New funding through the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-
101 et seq., that is actually received for salary increases shall be spent
exclusively for salary increases based upon the state general revenue portion
of total unrestricted educational and general revenue.
(3)(A) Funding received under this subsection shall be used for
no purposes other than to provide salary increases.
(B) Any designated funds not used for salary increases
under this subsection shall be recouped at the end of each fiscal year and
transferred by the division to the General Revenue Allotment Reserve Fund.

SECTION 8. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
01/31/2025 10:13:14 AM TNL158

SB172
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.

































01/31/2025 10:13:14 AM TNL158